Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2207.27
Education provider, defined.

Education provider means: Any real property appraisal or real-estate-related organization; proprietary school; accredited degree-awarding community college, college, or university; state or federal agency; or such other provider that may be approved by the board that provides real property appraiser training or education.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 19;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.11;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 16;

Laws 2019, LB77, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 60.